Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1692.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1692.9. Nothing in this act shall prohibit any of the
following:
A. Hunting birds or fowl in accordance with Oklahoma regulation
or statute, including, but not limited to, the sport of hunting game
with trained raptors.
B. Agricultural production of fowl for human consumption.
C. Cockfighting between a live fowl and a robot. The robot
under this subsection shall not harm the live fowl.

Req. No. 10093 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10093 JL 01/06/25





















Req. No. 10093 Page 2